Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
OBSTRUCTION OF PUBLIC ADMINISTRATION

§710-1010 Obstructing government
operations. (1) A person commits the offense of obstructing government
operations if, by using or threatening to use violence, force, or physical
interference or obstacle, the person intentionally obstructs, impairs, or
hinders:

(a) The performance of a governmental function by a
public servant acting under color of the public servant's official authority;

(b) The enforcement of the penal law or the
preservation of the peace by a law enforcement officer acting under color of
the law enforcement officer's official authority; or

(c) The operation of a radio, telephone, television,
or other telecommunication system owned or operated by the State or one of its
political subdivisions.

(2) This section does not apply to:

(a) The obstruction, impairment, or hindrance of the
making of an arrest;

(b) The obstruction, impairment, or hindrance of any
governmental function, as provided by law, in connection with a labor dispute
with the government; or

(c) A person who is making a video or audio
recording or taking a photograph of a law enforcement officer while the officer
is in the performance of the officer's duties in a public place or under
circumstances in which the officer has no reasonable expectation of privacy;
provided that the officer may take reasonable action to maintain safety and
control, secure crime scenes and accident sites, protect the integrity and
confidentiality of investigations, and protect the public safety and order.

(3) Obstruction of government operations is a
misdemeanor. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1980, c 150, §1; am L 1991, c 223,
§2; gen ch 1993; am L 2001, c 91, §3; am L 2016, c 164, §1]

COMMENTARY ON §710-1010

This section penalizes intentional interference with any
level of government within the State. Subsection (1)(a) is addressed to
governmental functions generally, subsection (1)(b) insures that peace officers
acting under color of official authority are covered. Although subsection (1)(b)
may not be needed, redundancy is to be preferred over ambiguity.

Two areas are specifically excepted from the operation of
this section. The first excepted area, that of the making of an arrest, is
covered under §710-1026 of this chapter. The second exception, that of labor
disputes involving the government, is an area of conflicting policies.

A labor dispute involving government
employees ... presents special problems. Without the subsection [(2)(b)]
exemption, activities which might constitute no more than tortious unfair labor
practices in the context of normal industrial disputes would take on the added
burden of criminal liability when the employer interfered with was the
Government ... [W]hile such activity should not necessarily be protected, the
appropriate sanctions should be determined by labor legislation, not the
Criminal Code....[1]

This section requires that the obstruction be by means of
violence, force, or physical interference. The Code takes the position that in
many instances of nonfeasance by private individuals, e.g., by a failure to
file a report required by law, the possibility of misdemeanor liability is too
severe a sanction. In those cases where failure to do some act is attended by
a substantial danger of disruption of governmental functions, special sections
have been drafted to deal with the problems.[2]

Previous Hawaii law dealt with obstruction of governmental
operations on an ad hoc basis; the previous coverage was somewhat spotty and
the cases covered carried different penalties.[3] Under previous law, threats
of violence against public officials were penalized as misdemeanors.[4] The
Code seeks to extend the coverage of prior law to encompass protection of all
governmental functions and to standardize the available penalties.

SUPPLEMENTAL COMMENTARY ON §710-1010

The Code as adopted by the legislature in 1972 differs from
the Proposed Draft in that in subsection (2)(b), the words "as provided by
law" were inserted after the word "function."

Act 150, Session Laws 1980, reduced the offense from a
misdemeanor to a petty misdemeanor. In view of the relatively light sentences
being imposed by the courts, the classification for the offense was changed to
a petty misdemeanor in order to keep the cases in the district court, thus
reducing the congestion in the circuit court and expediting the disposition of
these cases. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 693-80, House Standing
Committee Report No. 874-80.

Act 91, Session Laws 2001, clarified the offense of obstructing
government operations by adding the operation of a radio, telephone,
television, or other telecommunication system owned or operated by the State or
a county. Electronic communications are utilized extensively by State and
local governments, i.e., counties. Current law did not cover intentional
obstruction, impairment, or hindering of radio, telephone, television, or other
telecommunication systems owned or operated by the State or counties. Act 91
closed that gap.

Also, the term "peace officer," as used in the
Penal Code, caused the intermediate court of appeals to question whether the
term meant "law enforcement officer." Act 91 resolved the ambiguity
by substituting that term for "peace officer" [throughout the Penal
Code]. Conference Committee Report No. 23.

Act 164, Session Laws 2016, amended this section to establish
an exception to the offense of obstructing government operations for a person
making a video or audio recording or photograph of a law enforcement officer
while the officer is in the performance of duties in a public place or under
circumstances in which the officer has no reasonable expectation of privacy;
provided that the officer may take reasonable action to maintain safety and
control, secure crime scenes and accident sites, protect the integrity and
confidentiality of investigations, and protect the public safety and order.
The legislature found that with the popularity and widespread use of smart
phones with video or audio recording and photographing capabilities, recordings
and photos of law enforcement officers who are exercising their duties have
been used as evidence in police conduct matters or widely disseminated via
social media. However, such recordings and photographs may be seen as
obstructing government operations. Act 164 established an exception under
certain circumstances to enable a person to record or photograph a law
enforcement officer exercising the officer's duties without violating the law.
Senate Standing Committee Report No. 2525, Conference Committee Report No.
129-16.

__________

§710-1010 Commentary:

1. Prop. Mich. Rev. Cr. Code, comments at 329.

2. E.g., §§710-1011, 1012.

3. E.g., H.R.S. §§65-50 (interfering with the Kauai fire
department), 66-48 (interfering with the Maui fire department), 740-12
(interfering with fish and game wardens), 121-33 (interfering with the National
Guard).

4. H.R.S. §725-6.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next